Utah statutes.
19-6-711.   Application of used oil to the land -- Limitations.
(1)  A person may not apply used oil to the land as a dust or weed suppressant
or for other similar applications to the land unless the person has obtained:
(a)  written authorization as required under this chapter; and
(b)  a permit from the executive secretary.
(2)  The applicant for a permit under this section shall demonstrate:
(a)  the used oil is not mixed with any hazardous waste;
(b)  the used oil does not exhibit any hazardous characteristic other than
ignitability; and
(c)  how the applicant will minimize the impact on the environment of the use
of used oil as a dust or weed suppressant or for other similar applications to
the land.
(3)  Prior to acting on the application, the executive secretary shall provide
public notice of the application and shall provide opportunity for public
comment under Section 19-6-712.
